prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q čias    tokame          čias      
SFX Q čias    toki            čias      
SFX Q čias    tokų            čias      
SFX Q čias    tokiems         čias      
SFX Q čias    tokus           čias      
SFX Q čias    tokais          čias      
SFX Q čias    tokuose         čias      
SFX Q čias    toka            čias      
SFX Q čias    tokos           čias      
SFX Q čias    tokoje          čias      
SFX Q čias    tokoms          čias      
SFX Q čias    tokomis         čias      
SFX Q čias    tokose          čias      
SFX Q džias   dokai           džias     
SFX Q džias   dokas           džias     
SFX Q džias   doko            džias     
SFX Q džias   dokam           džias     
SFX Q džias   doką            džias     
SFX Q džias   doku            džias     
SFX Q džias   dokame          džias     
SFX Q džias   doki            džias     
SFX Q džias   dokų            džias     
SFX Q džias   dokiems         džias     
SFX Q džias   dokus           džias     
SFX Q džias   dokais          džias     
SFX Q džias   dokuose         džias     
SFX Q džias   doka            džias     
SFX Q džias   dokos           džias     
SFX Q džias   dokoje          džias     
SFX Q džias   dokoms          džias     
SFX Q džias   dokomis         džias     
SFX Q džias   dokose          džias     
